Arkansas, session 2025, SB136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 15, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 25 — Right to Try Individualized Investigational Treatment Act

20-15-2501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Right to Try
Individualized Investigational Treatment Act".

20-15-2502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
*JMB027*
01/28/2025 7:59:29 AM JMB027

SB136
(1) “Costs associated with the manufacture of the individualized
investigational treatment” means the actual out-of-pocket costs incurred in
providing the individualized investigational treatment to the patient in his
or her specific case;
(2) "Eligible facility" means an institution that is operating
under a Federalwide Assurance for the Protection of Human Subjects under 42
U.S.C. § 289(a) and 45 C.F.R. Part 46, as existing on January 1, 2025, and is
subject to the laws, regulations, policies, and guidelines relating to
Federalwide Assurance for the Protection of Human Subjects, including
renewals or updates;
(3) “Eligible patient” means a person who meets the requirements
of eligibility under § 20-15-2503;
(4) "Individualized investigational treatment" means a drug,
biological product, or device that is unique to and produced exclusively for
use for an individual patient, based on his or her own genetic profile,
including without limitation an individualized gene therapy antisense
oligonucleotide and individualized neoantigen vaccines;
(5) "Life-threatening" means a disease or condition:
(A) Where the likelihood of death is high unless the
course of the disease or condition is interrupted; and
(B) With a potentially fatal outcome, where the endpoint
of clinical trial analysis is survival;
(6) “Physician” means an individual licensed to practice
medicine in the State of Arkansas under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, §
17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq.; and
(7) "Severely debilitating" means a disease or condition that
causes major irreversible morbidity.

20-15-2503. Eligibility.
In order for a patient to access an individualized investigational
treatment under this subchapter, a physician shall document in the patient's
medical record and chart that the patient:
(1) Has a life-threatening or severely debilitating illness;
(2) Has considered all other treatment options currently
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Has received a recommendation from the physician for an
01/28/2025 7:59:29 AM JMB027

SB136
individualized investigational treatment based on analysis of the patient's
genomic sequence, human chromosomes, deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid,
genes, gene products such as enzymes and other types of proteins, or
metabolites;
(4)(A) Has given written, informed consent for the use of the
individualized investigational treatment.
(B) If the patient is a minor or lacks the mental capacity
to provide informed consent, a parent or legal guardian may provide written,
informed consent on the patient's behalf.
(C) The written, informed consent shall include at a
minimum:
(i) An explanation of the currently approved
products and treatments for the disease or condition of which the patient
suffers;
(ii) An attestation that the patient, or if the
patient is a minor or lacks the mental capacity to concur, a parent or legal
guardian, concurs with his or her physician in believing that all currently
approved and conventionally recognized treatments are unlikely to prolong the
patient’s life;
(iii) Clear identification of the specific proposed
individualized investigational treatment that the patient is seeking to use;
(iv) A description of the potentially best and worst
outcomes of using the individualized investigational treatment and a
realistic description of the most likely outcome, including without
limitation the possibility that new, unanticipated, different, or worse
symptoms might result, and that death could be hastened by the individualized
investigational treatment, which is based on the physician’s knowledge of the
individualized investigational treatment in conjunction with an awareness of
the patient’s condition;
(v) A statement that the patient’s health plan or
third-party administrator and provider are not obligated to pay for any care
or treatments consequent to the use of the individualized investigational
treatment, unless the patient’s health plan or third-party administrator and
provider are specifically required to do so by law or contract;
(vi) A statement that the patient’s eligibility for
hospice care may be withdrawn if the patient receives an individualized
01/28/2025 7:59:29 AM JMB027

SB136
investigational treatment and that care may be reinstated if the
individualized investigational treatment ends and the patient meets hospice
eligibility requirements; and
(vii) A statement that the patient understands that
he or she is liable for all expenses consequent to the use of the
individualized investigational treatment and that this liability extends to
the patient’s estate, unless a contract between the patient and the
manufacturer of the individualized investigational treatment states
otherwise; and
(5) Has received written documentation from a physician that the
patient meets the requirements of this subchapter.

20-15-2504. Availability.
(a) A manufacturer of an individualized investigational treatment
operating within an eligible facility may make available an individualized
investigational treatment available to eligible patients under this
subchapter.
(b) This section does not require that a manufacturer make available
an individualized investigational treatment to an eligible patient.

20-15-2505. Costs.
(a) A manufacturer of an individualized investigational treatment or
an eligible facility may:
(1) Provide an individualized investigational treatment to an
eligible patient without receiving compensation; or
(2) Require an eligible patient to pay the costs associated with
the manufacture of the individualized investigational treatment.
(b) If an eligible patient dies while receiving individualized
investigational treatment, the eligible patient's heirs are not liable for
any outstanding debt to the manufacturer related to the individualized
investigational treatment.

20-15-2506. Insurance coverage.
(a) An insurance company:
(1) May, but is not required to, provide coverage for an
individualized investigational treatment; and
01/28/2025 7:59:29 AM JMB027

SB136
(2) Shall not deny coverage for an item or service that is
otherwise covered by an insurance contract between the eligible person and
the insurance company.
(b) This subchapter does not affect any mandatory healthcare coverage
for participation in clinical trials or expand the health care coverage
required of an insurance company.

20-15-2507. Prohibited sanctions.
The recommendation, prescription, treatment, or participation in the
treatment of a life-threatening or severely debilitating illness with an
individualized investigational treatment shall not permit:
(1) A state agency or licensing board to revoke a license, fail
to renew a license, or take any other action against a medical professional's
license or a healthcare provider's license;
(2) A state agency, state official, or employee or agent of the
state to block or attempt to block an eligible patient's access to an
individualized investigational treatment; or
(3) An action against a hospital's Medicare certification.

20-15-2508. Counseling, advice, or recommendation not violation.
The counseling, advice, or recommendation consistent with medical
standards of care by a medical professional licensed under state law is not a
violation of this subchapter.

20-15-2509. Immunity.
(a) Except in the case of gross negligence or willful misconduct, a
person or entity that manufacturers, imports, distributes, prescribes,
dispenses, administers, or is otherwise involved in the care of an eligible
patient using an individualized investigational treatment is immune from
civil liability for any loss, damage, or injury arising out of, relating to,
or resulting from the individualized investigational treatment if the person
or entity is substantially complying in good faith with this subchapter and
has exercised reasonable care.
(b) This subchapter does not require a medical professional who is
licensed under the laws of this state to counsel, advise, prescribe,
dispense, administer, or otherwise be involved in the care of an eligible
01/28/2025 7:59:29 AM JMB027

SB136
patient using an individualized investigational treatment.
(c) This subchapter does not require a hospital licensed under § 20-9-
213 to provide any new or additional service related to an individualized
investigational treatment, unless approved by the hospital.

20-15-2510. Medicaid coverage.
This subchapter does not require the Department of Human Services or
the Arkansas Medicaid Program to provide additional coverage for an
individualized investigational treatment.



























01/28/2025 7:59:29 AM JMB027